Utah statutes.
17-43-302.   Local mental health authorities -- Requirements prior to distributing public funds.

(1)  Each local mental health authority shall award all public funds by complying with the requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code, or by complying with a county procurement ordinance which requires similar procurement practices.

(2)  If all initial bids on the project are rejected, the authority shall publish a new invitation to bid in the manner specified in this section.  If no satisfactory bid is received by the authority when the bids received from the second invitation are opened, the authority may execute a contract without requiring competitive bidding.

(3)  The local mental health authority need not comply with the procurement provisions of this section when it disburses public funds to another political subdivision of the state or an institution of higher education of the state.

(4)  Each contract awarded by a local mental health authority shall be for a fixed amount and limited period.  A contract may be modified due to changes in available funding for the same contract purpose without competition.

